New Jersey, session 222, S3093.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. Within six month of the effective date of this act, the Superintendent of State Police shall create and implement a policy that seeks to recruit and prioritize the selection of women and minorities to serve as civilian instructors and contractors at the State Police Academy in order to diversify the instruction received by State Police recruits. The superintendent shall review the policy annually, and update it as necessary, to effectuate the purposes of this act. b.    The superintendent shall submit a report annually to the Attorney General and the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), which includes, but is not limited to: (1) the age, gender, race, and ethnicity of each civilian instructor or contractor employed or otherwise compensated by the Division of State Police to provide recruit instruction at the State Police Academy; and (2) a summary of the annual review of the policy conducted pursuant to subsection a. of this section which details any updates to the policy. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.